Illinois, session 104th, SB1323.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Sections 60-5 and 60-10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/60-5)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 60-5. Registered professional nursing education 9programs. RN education program requirements; out-of-State 10programs.11    (a) The purpose of nursing education rules and regulations 12is to ensure that graduates of nursing education programs are 13prepared for safe and effective nursing practice. Early 14intervention when standards are not met assists programs in 15making improvements before warning signs are evident and 16before sanctions are necessary. The purpose of Board approval 17of a registered professional nursing education program is to 18do the following:19        (1) promote the safe practice of nursing by 20    implementing standards for individuals seeking licensure 21    as registered nurses;22        (2) grant regulatory recognition to nursing education 23    programs that the Board determines have met established   SB1323- 2 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    standards;2        (3) ensure graduates meet the educational and legal 3    requirements for the level of licensure that the graduates 4    are seeking;5        (4) facilitate graduates' endorsement to other states, 6    territories, and countries as appropriate; and7        (5) provide the public and prospective students with a 8    published list of approved nursing programs that meet the 9    standards established by law and the Board's rules. 10    (b) To establish a new registered professional nursing 11education program, the proposed program's administrator must 12notify the Board of the intention to establish a new program. 13The Board must approve the proposed program upon the 14successful completion of the following process and a site 15visit:16        (1) The proposed program must provide a feasibility 17    study that includes the following information to the 18    Board:19            (A) governing institution approval and ongoing 20        support;21            (B) evidence of adequate institutional financial 22        support that can be provided to the program on an 23        ongoing basis;24            (C) availability of educational resources, such as 25        human resources, physical resources (including access 26        to a library), clinical resources, and technical   SB1323- 3 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        learning resources;2            (D) evidence of the institution meeting the Board 3        of Higher Education's requirements and the 4        accreditation requirements by a national accrediting 5        body recognized by the United States Department of 6        Education;7            (E) evidence of the nursing program actively 8        seeking pre-accreditation or candidate accreditation 9        from a national accrediting body for nursing education 10        recognized by the United States Department of 11        Education;12            (F) evidence of adequate numbers of clinical 13        partnerships;14            (G) availability of qualified faculty members and 15        a program director; and16            (H) a proposed timeline for initiating the 17        program.18        (2) After the feasibility study has been submitted to 19    the Board, the proposed program must complete the 20    following program components and processes and submit 21    verification of completion to the Board:22            (A) employment of a qualified director;23            (B) development of a comprehensive program 24        curriculum;25            (C) submission of the program's ongoing systematic 26        evaluation plan;  SB1323- 4 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1            (D) establishment of policies for student 2        admission, progression, retention, and graduation; and3            (E) establishment of policies and strategies to 4        address students' needs, including those with 5        documented disabilities.6    (c) Nursing education rules must be based on 7evidence-based criteria and used to monitor the quality of a 8registered professional nursing education program. All 9registered professional nursing education programs must meet 10the following requirements:11        (1) The program must have written and published 12    criteria for student admission, progression, and 13    performance.14        (2) The written policies and procedures of the program 15    must be reviewed and approved by the program's identified 16    governing body and be readily accessible according to 17    accreditation standards.18        (3) The program must hold students responsible for 19    professional behavior, including honesty and integrity, 20    while in the program of study, as outlined in the 21    program's policies, procedures, or student handbook. 22        (4) The administrator of the program must (i) hold a 23    graduate degree in nursing, (ii) have a minimum of 2 years 24    of clinical nursing and nursing education experience, 25    (iii) hold a current, active, and unencumbered license as 26    a registered nurse in this State, (iv) have institutional   SB1323- 5 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    authority and administrative responsibility over the 2    program, and (v) be responsible for submitting the Board's 3    annual report, consisting of aggregate program data as 4    determined by the Board, by the provided deadline.5    (d) Faculty members of a registered professional nursing 6education program must meet the following criteria:7        (1) possess the requisite academic and experiential 8    qualifications; and9        (2) hold either:10            (A) a graduate degree in nursing with at least 2 11        years of practical experience, if the faculty member 12        teaches didactic nursing courses; or13            (B) a current, active, and unencumbered license as 14        a registered nurse in this State and a graduate degree 15        in nursing, if the faculty member teaches clinical, 16        lab, or simulation experience courses.17    A faculty member who does not hold a graduate degree in 18nursing, but who holds a bachelor's degree in nursing, may 19teach didactic nursing, clinical, lab, or simulation 20experience courses if the faculty member obtains a waiver from 21the Division of Professional Regulation. A faculty member who 22does not meet the requirements of paragraph (2) of this 23subsection but who obtains a waiver to teach shall be 24supervised by a faculty member with a graduate degree in 25nursing. No more than 20% of a program's faculty may have a 26waiver at one time.   SB1323- 6 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    (e) A registered professional nursing program must meet 2the following training and development requirements:3        (1) Faculty members must be oriented in accordance 4    with institutional policies and procedures. Orientation 5    may include basic instruction in teaching, adult learning 6    principles, learning assessment, curriculum development, 7    and other subjects included as appropriate to meet the 8    diverse needs of students and promote student learning and 9    success.10        (2) Newly hired faculty members must be mentored by 11    experientially prepared colleagues.12        (3) Faculty members must participate in ongoing 13    professional development.14        (4) The program must provide access to faculty 15    development activities.16    (f) To maintain enrollment in a registered professional 17nursing program, students must meet health standards, criminal 18background requirements, and other compliance standards as 19required by the program's clinical affiliation agreements.20    (g) The curriculum of a registered professional nursing 21program must meet the following requirements:22        (1) be built on a foundation of biological, physical, 23    social, and behavioral sciences;24        (2) have a written systematic evaluation plan in 25    place;26        (3) have didactic and clinical content that prepares   SB1323- 7 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    graduates to practice safely, utilize the nursing process 2    in a variety of clinical settings, and meet the holistic 3    needs of diverse individuals, families, communities, and 4    populations across the life span;5        (4) combined with clinical experiences, prepare the 6    graduate to take the NCLEX-RN exam for licensure;7        (5) have strategies that are in place to remediate 8    errors and near-misses in the clinical setting;9        (6) meet the standards of the program's accrediting 10    body;11        (7) have clinical affiliation agreements in place for 12    clinical experiences;13        (8) have distance education methods that are 14    consistent with the accreditation and regulatory 15    standards; and16        (9) provide direct care clinical experiences with 17    patients, as defined by accrediting and regulatory bodies.18    (h) A professional nursing education program shall not use 19simulation as a substitute for traditional clinical 20experiences for more than 50% of a course's total clinical 21hours. Programs may seek an exception to this subsection from 22the Board based on unique circumstances. A program that uses 23simulation must meet the following standards:24        (1) The program must demonstrate that the simulation 25    activities are linked to course or programmatic learning 26    outcomes.  SB1323- 8 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        (2) The program must have short-term and long-term 2    plans for integrating simulation into the curriculum, a 3    method of debriefing each simulated activity, and a plan 4    to orient faculty to simulation.5        (3) The program must develop criteria to evaluate the 6    simulation activities and allow students to evaluate the 7    simulation experience on an ongoing basis.8    (i) The program's resources must be sufficient to support 9the program's needs to meet its mission, goals, and outcomes. 10The program must provide accessibility resources to all 11students, including those enrolled in distance education, and 12institutional resources that assist students with academic and 13financial challenges.14    (j) A registered professional nursing program must be 15accredited by a national accrediting body recognized by the 16United States Department of Education. If the program has its 17accreditation revoked, the program must submit a copy of the 18notice of revocation from the accrediting body to the Board 19within 30 days after receipt.20    (k) If the Board obtains evidence at any time that a 21registered professional nursing program does not comply with 22this Act, the Board may perform an unannounced site visit. 23Such evidence may include, but is not limited to, the 24following:25        (1) complaints from students, faculty, or clinical 26    agencies;   SB1323- 9 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        (2) program administrator turnover of more than 3 2    administrators in 5 years, excluding interim appointments;3        (3) unexplained nursing faculty turnover or cuts in 4    the number of nursing faculty;5        (4) a pattern of NCLEX pass rates less than 75%, as 6    defined by rule; and7        (5) loss of national programmatic accreditation.8    (a) All registered professional nurse education programs 9must be reviewed by the Board and approved by the Department 10before the successful completion of such a program may be 11applied toward meeting the requirements for registered 12professional nurse licensure under this Act. Any program 13changing the level of educational preparation or the 14relationship with or to the parent institution or establishing 15an extension of an existing program must request a review by 16the Board and approval by the Department. The Board shall 17review and make a recommendation for the approval or 18disapproval of a program by the Department based on the 19following criteria:20        (1) a feasibility study that describes the need for 21    the program and the facilities used, the potential of the 22    program to recruit faculty and students, financial support 23    for the program, and other criteria, as established by 24    rule;25        (2) program curriculum that meets all State 26    requirements;  SB1323- 10 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        (2.5) measurement of program effectiveness based on a 2    passage rate of all graduates over the 3 most recent 3    calendar years without reference to first-time test 4    takers; 5        (3) the administration of the program by a Nurse 6    Administrator and the involvement of a Nurse Administrator 7    in the development of the program;8        (4) the occurrence of a site visit prior to approval; 9    and10        (5) beginning December 31, 2022, obtaining and 11    maintaining programmatic accreditation by a national 12    accrediting body for nursing education recognized by the 13    United States Department of Education and approved by the 14    Department.15    The Department and Board of Nursing shall be notified 16within 30 days if the program loses its accreditation. The 17Department may adopt rules regarding a warning process and 18reaccreditation. 19    (b) In order to obtain initial Department approval and to 20maintain Department approval, a registered professional 21nursing program must meet all of the following requirements:22        (1) The institution responsible for conducting the 23    program and the Nurse Administrator must ensure that 24    individual faculty members are academically and 25    professionally competent.26        (2) The program curriculum must contain all applicable   SB1323- 11 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    requirements established by rule, including both theory 2    and clinical components.3        (3) The passage rates of the program's graduating 4    classes on the State-approved licensure exam must be 5    deemed satisfactory by the Department.6    (c) Program site visits to an institution conducting or 7hosting a professional nursing program may be made at the 8discretion of the Nursing Coordinator or upon recommendation 9of the Board. Full routine site visits may be conducted by the 10Department for periodic evaluation. Such visits shall be used 11to determine compliance with this Act. Full routine site 12visits must be announced and may be waived at the discretion of 13the Department if the program maintains accreditation with an 14accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of 15Education and approved by the Department.16    (d) Any institution conducting a registered professional 17nursing program that wishes to discontinue the program must do 18each of the following:19        (1) Notify the Department, in writing, of its intent 20    to discontinue the program.21        (2) Continue to meet the requirements of this Act and 22    the rules adopted thereunder until the official date of 23    termination of the program.24        (3) Notify the Department of the date on which the 25    last student shall graduate from the program and the 26    program shall terminate.  SB1323- 12 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        (4) Assist remaining students in the continuation of 2    their education in the event of program termination prior 3    to the graduation of the program's final student.4        (5) Upon the closure of the program, notify the 5    Department, in writing, of the location of student and 6    graduate records' storage.7    (l) (e) Out-of-State registered professional nursing 8education programs planning to offer clinical practice 9experiences in this State must meet the requirements set forth 10in this Section and must meet the clinical and faculty 11requirements for institutions outside of this State, as 12established by rule. The institution responsible for 13conducting an out-of-State registered professional nursing 14education program and the administrator of the program shall 15be responsible for ensuring that the individual faculty and 16preceptors overseeing the clinical experience are academically 17and professionally competent. 18    (m) To operate under this Act, a registered professional 19nursing education program must maintain approval by the Board 20in accordance with the following:21        (1) A registered professional nursing education 22    program must complete and submit an annual evaluation 23    report to the Board and maintain programmatic 24    accreditation by a national accrediting body for nursing 25    education recognized by the United States Department of 26    Education.  SB1323- 13 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        (2) The Board shall review and analyze various sources 2    of information regarding program performance before 3    granting annual approval, including, but not limited to:4            (A) previous Board survey visits and reports;5            (B) annual report data;6            (C) evidence of accreditation by a national 7        accrediting body for nursing education recognized by 8        the United States Department of Education;9            (D) Board-recognized national accreditation 10        visits, reports, and other pertinent national 11        accreditation documents provided by the program; and12            (E) results of ongoing programmatic evaluation.13        (3) Annual approval shall be granted to a registered 14    professional nursing education program upon the Board's 15    verification that the program complies with the Board's 16    nursing education administrative rules and with this Act.17    (n) If a registered professional nursing education program 18loses its national accreditation, the program must do the 19following:20        (1) notify the Board within 30 days after the loss; 21    and22        (2) immediately notify all enrolled students and 23    applicants of the loss of its national accreditation and 24    the corrective actions the program will take to regain the 25    accreditation.26    The Board, upon receipt of the program's notice, shall   SB1323- 14 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1place the program on probationary status and issue the program 2a warning letter that informs the program of the probationary 3status and the corrective actions necessary to be in 4compliance with this Act. The program must regain its national 5accreditation status and correct the deficiencies identified 6by the Board within 12 months, unless otherwise directed by 7the Board. If the deficiencies are not corrected within the 8specified time frame, the Board may withdraw the program's 9approval status.10    (o) The Board shall make the policies and procedures 11related to probationary status transparent, and related forms 12shall be readily available to program administrators on the 13Board's website.14    (p) The Board may withdraw its approval of a registered 15professional nursing education program if, after proper notice 16and an opportunity to be heard are provided, it determines 17that:18        (1) the program fails to meet the Department of 19    Financial and Professional Regulation's rules regarding 20    this Act;21        (2) the program failed to correct the identified 22    deficiencies within the time specified by the Board; or23        (3) there is evidence of fraud or dishonesty in the 24    program's application for program approval.25    The Board may reinstate approval if the program submits 26evidence of compliance with the nursing education rules and   SB1323- 15 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1this Act within the provided time frame.2    (q) A registered professional nursing education program 3denied approval or placed on probationary status may appeal 4such a decision. All actions related to an appeal shall be in 5accordance with due process rights.6    (r) A registered professional nursing education program 7may be closed due to withdrawal of Board approval or may close 8voluntarily. In the event of closure, regardless of cause, the 9program shall:10        (1) make provisions to maintain the standards for 11    nursing education during the transition to closure;12        (2) arrange for secure storage and access to academic 13    records and transcripts;14        (3) develop a teach-out plan to assist students in 15    completing their nursing education; and16        (4) provide written confirmation to the Board that the 17    teach-out plan has been implemented.18    (s) During a declared state of emergency or a disaster 19declared by the Governor, the Board may authorize an approved 20registered professional nursing education programs to 21implement mitigation efforts to address issues, including, but 22not limited to, the availability of clinical placement sites, 23the transition to virtual learning from in-person platforms, 24and changes in the use of simulation. The program shall keep 25records of any mitigation policies or strategies used and the 26program shall include such records in its annual report   SB1323- 16 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1submitted to the Board.2    (t) The Department may, without hearing, rescind the 3license of any person who obtained a license after completing 4a program or obtaining credit from a program that does not meet 5the requirements of this Section. Such rescission shall not 6constitute discipline as provided in Section 70-5 of this Act. 7The Department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.8(Source: P.A. 103-533, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    (225 ILCS 65/60-10)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)11    Sec. 60-10. RN licensure by examination.12    (a) Each applicant who successfully meets the requirements 13of this Section is eligible for licensure as a registered 14professional nurse.15    (b) An applicant for licensure by examination to practice 16as a registered professional nurse is eligible for licensure 17when the following requirements are met:18        (1) the applicant has submitted a completed written 19    application, on forms provided by the Department, and 20    fees, as established by the Department;21        (2) the applicant has graduated from a professional 22    nursing education program approved by the Department or 23    has been granted a certificate of completion of 24    pre-licensure requirements from another United States 25    jurisdiction;  SB1323- 17 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1        (3) the applicant has successfully completed a 2    licensure examination approved by the Department;3        (4) (blank);4        (5) the applicant has submitted to the criminal 5    history records check required under Section 50-35 of this 6    Act;7        (6) the applicant has submitted, either to the 8    Department or its designated testing service, a fee 9    covering the cost of providing the examination; failure to 10    appear for the examination on the scheduled date at the 11    time and place specified after the applicant's application 12    for examination has been received and acknowledged by the 13    Department or the designated testing service shall result 14    in the forfeiture of the examination fee; and15        (7) the applicant has met all other requirements 16    established by the Department by rule. 17    An applicant for licensure by examination may take the 18Department-approved examination in another jurisdiction.19    (b-3) An applicant who graduates from a professional 20nursing program in this State on or after January 1, 2024 (the 21effective date of Public Act 103-533) this amendatory Act of 22the 103rd General Assembly and does not take the licensure 23examination within 180 days after his or her degree is 24conferred by the institution of higher education or fails the 25licensure examination for a second time shall be required to 26demonstrate proof of completion of a National Council   SB1323- 18 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1Licensure Examination preparatory class or a comparable test 2preparatory program before taking a subsequent licensure 3examination or the graduate may return to the institution of 4higher education from which he or she graduated which shall 5provide remedial educational resources to the graduate at no 6cost to the graduate. Such an applicant must contact the 7institution of higher education from which he or she graduated 8prior to retesting. 9    (b-4) (Blank). All professional nursing programs in 10probationary status on the effective date of this amendatory 11Act of the 103rd General Assembly and subject to a program 12revision plan shall be deemed in good standing for a period of 133 years beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 14of the 103rd General Assembly. Prior to September 1, 2026, no 15professional nursing program shall be placed on probationary 16status for failing to reach a passage rate of less than 75%. 17    (b-5) If an applicant for licensure by examination 18neglects, fails, or refuses to take an examination or fails to 19pass an examination for a license within 3 years of the date of 20initial application, the application shall be denied. When an 21applicant's application is denied due to the failure to pass 22the examination within the 3-year period, that applicant must 23undertake an additional course of education as defined by rule 24prior to submitting a new application for licensure. Any new 25application must be accompanied by the required fee, evidence 26of meeting the requirements in force at the time of the new   SB1323- 19 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1application, and evidence of completion of the additional 2course of education prescribed by rule.3    (c) An applicant for licensure by examination shall have 4one year after the date of notification of the successful 5completion of the examination to apply to the Department for a 6license. If an applicant fails to apply within one year, the 7applicant shall be required to retake and pass the examination 8unless licensed in another jurisdiction of the United States.9    (d) An applicant for licensure by examination who passes 10the Department-approved licensure examination for professional 11nursing may obtain employment as a license-pending registered 12nurse and practice under the direction of a registered 13professional nurse or an advanced practice registered nurse 14until such time as he or she receives his or her license to 15practice or until the license is denied. In no instance shall 16any such applicant practice or be employed in any management 17capacity. An individual may be employed as a license-pending 18registered nurse if all of the following criteria are met:19        (1) He or she has completed and passed the 20    Department-approved licensure exam and presents to the 21    employer the official written notification indicating 22    successful passage of the licensure examination.23        (2) He or she has completed and submitted to the 24    Department an application for licensure under this Section 25    as a registered professional nurse.26        (3) He or she has submitted the required licensure   SB1323- 20 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    fee.2        (4) He or she has met all other requirements 3    established by rule, including having submitted to a 4    criminal history records check.5    (e) The privilege to practice as a license-pending 6registered nurse shall terminate with the occurrence of any of 7the following:8        (1) Six months have passed since the official date of 9    passing the licensure exam as inscribed on the formal 10    written notification indicating passage of the exam. The 11    6-month license-pending period may be extended if more 12    time is needed by the Department to process the licensure 13    application.14        (2) Receipt of the registered professional nurse 15    license from the Department.16        (3) Notification from the Department that the 17    application for licensure has been refused.18        (4) A request by the Department that the individual 19    terminate practicing as a license-pending registered nurse 20    until an official decision is made by the Department to 21    grant or deny a registered professional nurse license.22    (f) (Blank).23    (g) (Blank).24    (h) (Blank).25    (i) (Blank).26    (j) (Blank).  SB1323- 21 -LRB104 07551 AAS 17595 b1    (k) All applicants for registered professional nurse 2licensure have 3 years after the date of application to 3complete the application process. If the process has not been 4completed within 3 years after the date of application, the 5application shall be denied, the fee forfeited, and the 6applicant must reapply and meet the requirements in effect at 7the time of reapplication.8    (l) All applicants for registered nurse licensure by 9examination who are graduates of practical nursing educational 10programs in a country other than the United States and its 11territories shall have their nursing education credentials 12evaluated by a Department-approved nursing credentialing 13evaluation service. No such applicant may be issued a license 14under this Act unless the applicant's program is deemed by the 15nursing credentialing evaluation service to be equivalent to a 16professional nursing education program approved by the 17Department. An applicant who has graduated from a nursing 18educational program outside of the United States or its 19territories and whose first language is not English shall 20submit evidence of English proficiency, as defined by rule.21    (m) (Blank).22(Source: P.A. 103-533, eff. 1-1-24; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25.)